Florida, session 2026, SB944.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 17 95.11, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 18 95.11âLimitations other than for the recovery of real 19 property.âActions other than for recovery of real property shall 20 be commenced as follows: 21 (3)âWITHIN FOUR YEARS.â 22 (b)1.âAn action founded on the design, planning, or 23 construction of an improvement to real property, with the time 24 running from the earliest date of: 25 a.âCompletion of the improvement; 26 b.âThe date of abandonment of construction, if not 27 completed; 28 c.âThe date of termination of the contract between the 29 architect, landscape architect, interior designer, engineer, 30 surveyor and mapper, or licensed contractor and his or her 31 employer, but only as to the architect, landscape architect, 32 interior designer, engineer, surveyor and mapper, or licensed 33 contractor who has abandoned construction or whose contract is 34 terminated; or 35 d.âIf sub-subparagraphs a., b., and c. do not apply, 36 completion of the contract between the architect, landscape 37 architect, interior designer, engineer, surveyor and mapper, or 38 licensed contractor and his or her employer. the authority 39 having jurisdiction issues a temporary certificate of occupancy, 40 a certificate of occupancy, or a certificate of completion, or 41 the date of abandonment of construction if not completed, 42 whichever date is earliest; except that, 43 2.âAn when the action involving involves a latent defect, 44 with the time running runs from the time the defect is 45 discovered or should have been discovered with the exercise of 46 due diligence. 47 3.âIn any event, the action must be commenced within 7 48 years after the earliest date of: 49 a.âCompletion of the improvement; 50 b.âThe date of abandonment of construction, if not 51 completed; 52 c.âThe date of termination of the contract between the 53 architect, landscape architect, interior designer, engineer, 54 surveyor and mapper, or licensed contractor and his or her 55 employer, but only as to the architect, landscape architect, 56 interior designer, engineer, surveyor and mapper, or licensed 57 contractor who has abandoned construction or whose contract is 58 terminated; or 59 d.âIf sub-subparagraphs a., b., and c. do not apply, 60 completion of the contract between the architect, landscape 61 architect, interior designer, engineer, surveyor and mapper, or 62 licensed contractor and his or her employer the authority having 63 jurisdiction issues a temporary certificate of occupancy, a 64 certificate of occupancy, or a certificate of completion, or the 65 date of abandonment of construction if not completed, whichever 66 date is earliest. 67 4.âFor purposes of this paragraph, âcompletion of the 68 improvementâ means the earliest of: 69 a.âFor an improvement in which the authority having 70 jurisdiction is required to issue a certificate of occupancy, 71 the issuance of a temporary certificate of occupancy or 72 certificate of occupancy, whichever date is earlier; 73 b.âFor an improvement that is required to comply with the 74 Florida Building Code but does not require the authority having 75 jurisdiction to issue a certificate of occupancy, completion of 76 all required inspections under the Florida Building Code or 77 issuance of a certificate of completion, whichever date is 78 earlier; or 79 c.âFor an improvement made pursuant to chapters 334-349, 80 final acceptance, as defined in s. 337.185(2)(c). 81 5.âFor purposes of this paragraph, âcompletion of the 82 contractâ means the later of the date of final performance of 83 all the contracted services or the date that final payment for 84 such services becomes due without regard to the date final 85 payment is made. 86 6.âHowever, counterclaims, cross-claims, and third-party 87 claims that arise out of the conduct, transaction, or occurrence 88 set out or attempted to be set out in a pleading may be 89 commenced up to 1 year after the pleading to which such claims 90 relate is served, even if such claims would otherwise be time 91 barred. With respect to actions founded on the design, planning, 92 or construction of an improvement to real property, if such 93 construction is performed pursuant to a duly issued building 94 permit and if the authority having jurisdiction has issued a 95 temporary certificate of occupancy, a certificate of occupancy, 96 or a certificate of completion, then as to the construction 97 which is within the scope of such building permit and 98 certificate, the correction of defects to completed work or 99 repair of completed work, whether performed under warranty or 100 otherwise, does not extend the period of time within which an 101 action must be commenced. If a newly constructed single-dwelling 102 residential building is used as a model home, the time begins to 103 run from the date that a deed is recorded first transferring 104 title to another party. Notwithstanding any provision of this 105 section to the contrary, if the improvement to real property 106 consists of the design, planning, or construction of multiple 107 buildings, each building must be considered its own improvement 108 for purposes of determining the limitations period set forth in 109 this paragraph. 110 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.